Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1936.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin MINNESOTA ALLIANCE OF BOYS AND GIRLS CLUBS; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $1,250,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,250,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Minnesota Alliance of Boys and Girls Clubs to administer a statewide project of youth job skills and career development. This project, which may have career guidance components including health and life skills, must be designed to encourage, train, and assist youth in early access to education and job-seeking skills, work-based learning experience, including career pathways in STEM learning, career exploration and matching, and first job placement through local community partnerships and on-site job opportunities. This grant requires a 25 percent match from nonstate resources. These are onetime appropriations. new text end